esu.seg.twol
Alphabet 

a c e g i k l m n p q r s t u v w y m̄ n̄
vv ll ss gg rr ng n͞g u͡g u͡gg u͡r u͡rr
%[e%] ʼ

%=:%>
%>:0 %>:%> ; 

Rules 

"Collapse morpheme boundaries"
%>:0 <=> %> :0* _ ; 

"Convert enclitic to hyphen"
%=:%> <=> _ ; 
